Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2754YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 555 Section 1. Section 299.12, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. (1) When a child becomes chronically absent, a school 3 official shall send do all of the following: 4 (a) Send a notice by ordinary mail or electronic mail to 5 the county attorney of the county in which the public schoolâs 6 central administrative office is located , and . 7 (b) Send a notice by certified ordinary mail , and 8 electronic mail if known, to the childâs parent, guardian, 9 or legal or actual custodian of the child, if the child is 10 not an emancipated minor, or to the child, if the child is an 11 emancipated minor , that includes . 12 (2) The notices sent pursuant to subparagraph (1) must 13 include information related to the childâs absences from school 14 and the policies and disciplinary processes associated with 15 additional absences. 16